Louisiana, session 2026, HB240.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:3580.13(B) and (C) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
9:3580.13 (D) and (E) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3580.13. Disclosure of financing agreements; discovery
* * *
B. A litigation financer with a litigation financing contract or agreement
shall not receive or recover, whether directly or indirectly, any amount greater than
an amount equal to the share of the proceeds collectively recovered by the plaintiffs
or claimants in a civil action, administrative proceeding, legal claim, or other legal
proceeding seeking to recover monetary damages financed by a litigation financing
contract or agreement after the payment of any attorney fees and costs owed in
connection to such action, claim, or proceedings.
B. C. The existence of a litigation financing contract or agreement is subject
to discovery in accordance with the Code of Civil Procedure and Code of Evidence
in all civil actions.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-950 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 240
D. An attorney who enters into a litigation financing contract or agreement
shall disclose the existence of the contract or agreement and deliver a copy of the
contract or agreement to the client he represents in the civil action, administrative
proceeding, claim, or other legal proceeding financed by the agreement within thirty
days after being retained as counsel by the client, or within thirty days after entering
into the litigation financing agreement, whichever is earlier.
C. E. This Chapter shall does not apply to nonprofit legal organizations
funded by private donors that represent clients on a pro bono basis. Awards of costs
or attorney fees to nonprofit legal organizations shall not be affected by this Chapter.
This Chapter shall not be interpreted to require a nonprofit legal organization to
disclose its donors or sources of funding.